North Carolina statutes. Chapter 57D. North Carolina Limited Liability Company Act.
Part 2. Managers.

§ 57D-3-20.
Management; managers.

The management of an LLC and its business is vested in the managers.

Each manager has equal rights to participate in the management of the LLC and its business. Management decisions approved by a majority of the managers are controlling. The managers may make management decisions without a meeting and without notice.

Subject to the direction and control of a majority of the managers as provided in G.S. 57D-3-20(b), each manager may act on behalf of the LLC in the ordinary course of the LLC’s business.

All members by virtue of their status as members are managers of the LLC, together with any other person or persons who may be designated as a manager in, or in the manner provided in, the operating agreement. If the operating agreement provides or otherwise contemplates that members are not necessarily managers by virtue of their status as members, then those persons designated as managers in, or in the manner provided in, the operating agreement will be managers. The operating agreement may provide that the LLC is to be managed by one or more company officials who are not designated as managers. All members will be managers for any period during which the LLC would otherwise not have any managers or other company officials.

A person shall continue to serve as a manager until the earliest of the following occurs: (i) the person’s resignation as a manager; (ii) any event described in G.S. 57D-3-02(a) with respect to the person, substituting therein the term “manager” in lieu of the term “member” for purposes of this subsection; or (iii) that person, or the member or all of a class or group of less than all of the members who appointed the person to be a manager, ceases to be a member.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-3-21.
Duties of company officials; standards of conduct.

The managers shall manage the LLC and conduct the LLC’s business in accordance with the operating agreement.

Each manager shall discharge that person’s duties (i) in good faith, (ii) with the care an ordinary prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, and (iii) subject to the operating agreement, in a manner the manager believes to be in the best interests of the LLC. In discharging such duties, a manager is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements or other financial data, if prepared or presented by any person or group of persons the manager believes to be reliable and competent in such matters and the manager does not have actual knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes such reliance unwarranted.

A manager is not liable to the LLC for any act or omission as a manager if the manager acts in compliance with this section.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-3-22.
Delegation of authority of managers and other company officials.

The managers having general power to manage the LLC may delegate authority to act on behalf of the LLC to persons other than managers. The delegation of authority may be general or limited to specific matters. No such delegation of authority will cause any manager to cease to be a manager or cause the person to whom authority is so delegated to be a manager. Any duties of the managers will apply with respect to their delegation to, and direction and control of, any person to whom they delegate any of their responsibilities.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-3-23.
Application to company officials.

G.S. 57D-3-20(e), 57D-3-21, and 57D-3-22 shall apply to company officials who are not managers by substituting the term “company official” in lieu of the term “manager” in each place where the term appears in those provisions.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§§ 57D-3-24 through 57D-3-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.